North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-04 Barbers
43-04-48.
Appeals.

Any applicant or licensee aggrieved by any action of the board taken under any of the provisions of this chapter, within thirty days after receipt of a copy of the order of the board, may file a petition in the district court, which has jurisdiction to affirm, reverse, vacate, or modify the order complained of. The board of barber examiners of North Dakota must be the defendant, and such petition must set forth the errors complained of. Unless they are waived, citations and other judicial process must be served upon the president of the board, or in the event of the president’s absence, upon any member of the board, or by leaving a copy at the office of the board or the office of the secretary-treasurer. Upon such service or waiver, the board, with its answer, shall file a transcript of the records of the board, and the original papers or transcripts thereof, and a certified transcript of all evidence adduced upon the hearing before the board in the proceedings complained of, which must be filed in the court. No proceedings to vacate, reverse, or modify a final order rendered by the board may operate to stay the execution or effect thereof unless the district court, or a judge thereof in vacation, on application and three days’ notice to the board, shall allow such stay, in which event the petitioner must be required to execute the petitioner’s bond in such a sum as the court may prescribe, with sufficient surety to the satisfaction of the court, conditioned for the prompt payment of all damages arising from or caused by the delay in the effectiveness or enforcement of the order complained of.

Source:

S.L. 1943, ch. 93, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 43-0448.

Cross-References.

Administrative Agencies Practice Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-32.

43-04-49.
Deceptive acts — Barber poles.

A person may not advertise, hold out to the public, or represent in any manner that the person is authorized to practice barbering unless the person is authorized under this chapter to practice barbering or authorized to employ or lease space to a barber. A person not authorized to practice barbering or not authorized to employ or lease space to a barber may not place a barber pole in a location that would create or tend to create the impression to members of the general public that a business located near the barber pole is a barbershop unless the location of the barber pole is related to a business authorized to operate a barbershop. As used in this section, barber pole means a red, white, or blue striped vertical cylinder with a ball located on the top, bottom, or top and bottom of the cylinder, or any object or facsimile of similar nature, regardless of the actual shape or coloring, if the object or facsimile would tend to create an impression to members of the general public that a business located near the object is a barbershop.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 358, § 1.